Alabama, session 2026rs, HB648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Tourism Revenue Recovery and Global Promotion Act.
Section 2. The purpose of this act is to support the
recovery and expansion of the state's tourism industry in
response to global travel and economic disruptions related to
trade policies and international conditions.
Section 3. For the purpose of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Tourism Department.
(2) ELIGIBLE TOURISM BUSINESS. A company engaged in
lodging, travel, entertainment, attractions, or hospitality
services.
(3) TOURISM-RELATED DISRUPTION. Any decline in
visitation, revenue, or operations due to global travel
restrictions, retaliatory trade measures, or macroeconomic
trade effects.
Section 4. (a) A grant program for eligible tourism
businesses adversely affected by tourism-related disruptions
is created to be administered by the department.
(b) Grant funds may be used for:
(1) Retaining or rehiring staff;
(2) Updating facilities or safety protocols; or
(3) Marketing or operational continuity.
(c) The department may not award more than one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) to any single entity.
Page 2

thousand dollars ($100,000) to any single entity.
HB648 INTRODUCED
Section 5. (a) The department shall administer
international tourism marketing campaigns to:
(1) Expand brand presence in emerging or alternative
travel markets;
(2) Restore inbound travel from countries affected by
trade tensions; and
(3) Partner with airlines, travel platforms, and
influencers.
(b) These campaigns shall be data-driven and
coordinated with destination marketing organizations.
Section 6. (a) A competitive grant program to fund
tourism-related infrastructure projects is created to be
administered by the department.
(b) Grant funds may be used for:
(1) Improvements to parks, trails, cultural landmarks,
and public event venues;
(2) Construction or renovation of visitor centers and
welcome facilities;
(3) Signage, wayfinding, and mobility improvements; and
(4) International and domestic trade shows and tour
operators.
Section 7. (a) The department shall coordinate a
domestic advertising effort to promote:
(1) In-state tourism and short-term travel;
(2) Heritage, outdoor recreation, and culinary
experiences;
(3) Events and seasonal travel in regions experiencing
downturns in tourism; and
Page 3

downturns in tourism; and
HB648 INTRODUCED
(4) International and domestic trade shows and tour
operators.
(b) These campaigns shall utilize television, digital
media, print, and social channels.
Section 8. (a) The Tourism Sector Economic Monitoring
Council is established.
(b) The council shall consist of five members with one
member each appointed by the Governor, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, the House Minority Leader, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Senate Minority
Leader.
(c) After the initial appointments, each member shall
serve a term of four years and may be reappointed for one
additional term.
(d) The council members shall not receive compensation
100 for their services but shall receive per diem and
101 reimbursement for necessary expenses incurred for conducting
102 official business and attending required official meetings.
103 (e) The council shall have the following duties:
104 (1) Monitor national and international trends.
105 (2) Analyze risks related to trade and global economic
106 conditions.
107 (3) Advise the Governor and Legislature on adaptive
108 strategies.
109 (4) Publish an annual tourism impact report. The
110 department shall post this report publicly on its website.
111 Section 9. Any program, campaign, or initiative
112 provided by this act may be funded from any of the following
Page 4

provided by this act may be funded from any of the following
HB648 INTRODUCED
113 revenue sources:
114 (1) Revenue sources as directed by, and at the
115 discretion of, the Legislature.
116 (2) Appropriations as directed by, and at the
117 discretion of, the Legislature.
118 (3) Any other lawful source, including, but not limited
119 to, private funding, gifts, donations, and bequests.
120 Section 10. If any provision of this act is held
121 invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions
122 which can be given effect without the invalid provision.
123 Section 11. This act shall become effective on October
124 1, 2026.
Page 5